District of Columbia statutes.
31-3252

Application for becoming credentialed.

(a)

A health insurer or its credentialing intermediary shall accept the uniform credentialing form as the sole application for a health care provider to become credentialed or recredentialed for a provider panel of the health insurer.

(b)

A health insurer or its credentialing intermediary shall make the uniform credentialing form available to any health care provider that is to be credentialed or re-credentialed by the health insurer or credentialing intermediary.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-96, § 102, 49 DCR 991